Washington statutes.
RCW 31.12.265

Officers.

(1) The board at its first meeting after the annual membership meeting shall elect board officers from among its members, as provided in the credit union's bylaws. The board will elect as many board officers as it deems necessary for transacting the business of the board of the credit union. The board officers shall hold office until their successors are qualified and elected, unless sooner removed as provided in this chapter. All board officers must be elected members of the board. However, the office of board treasurer and board secretary may be held by the same person and need not be elected members of the board.

(2) The board may designate as many operating officers as it deems necessary for conducting the business of the credit union, including, but not limited to, a principal operating officer. Individuals serving as operating officers may also serve as board officers in accordance with subsection (1) of this section and subject to RCW 31.12.235(4).

[ 1997 c 397 s 18; 1994 c 256 s 80; 1987 c 338 s 4; 1984 c 31 s 28.]

NOTES:

Findings—Construction—1994 c 256: See RCW 43.320.007.